District of Columbia statutes.
8-904

Bounty.

The Mayor is authorized to offer and pay rewards for information that, in the opinion of the Mayor, leads to the apprehension and charging of any person for violating § 8-902(a) and the collection of a penalty or fine from the person.

History

May 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-117, § 5, 41 DCR 524

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2914.